Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-610
Societies declared to be corporations; power to act as administrator, executor, guardian, or trustee.

When any such organization shall have established in this state an institution for the care of children or persons who are incapacitated in any manner and such institution shall have been incorporated under the laws of Nebraska, such corporation shall have power to act either by itself or jointly with any natural person or persons (1) as administrator of the estate of any deceased person whose domicile was within the county in which the corporation is located or whose domicile was outside the State of Nebraska, (2) as executor under a last will and testament or as guardian of the property of any infant, person with mental retardation, person with a mental disorder, or person under other disability, or (3) as trustee for any person or of the estate of any deceased person under the appointment of any court of record having jurisdiction of the estate of such person.

Laws 1917, c. 11, § 1, p. 70;

Laws 1919, c. 156, § 1, p. 353;

Laws 1921, c. 147, § 1, p. 624;

Laws 1921, c. 174, § 1, p. 672;

C.S.1922, § 504;

Laws 1923, c. 34, § 1, p. 146;

Laws 1925, c. 148, § 1, p. 386;

Laws 1929, c. 57, § 1, p. 225;

C.S.1929, § 24-607;

Laws 1935, c. 46, § 1, p. 171;

Laws 1937, c. 52, § 1, p. 218;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 24-607;

R.S.1943, § 21-610;

Laws 1986, LB 1177, § 3.